Hawaii, session 2025, GM1342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that invasive pests such
as insects and pathogens found on firewood imported into the
State can pose a significant risk to native forests and plants.
Firewood harvested from low-quality living trees or dead trees
can continue to harbor the pests or diseases that led to the
trees' poor condition or death.
A number of pests established in the continental United
States, such as the emerald ash borer and Asian longhorned
beetle, and diseases such as the laurel wilt pathogen, which
kills laurel and avocado, and oak wilt, which kills oak trees,
including many other pests and diseases, can travel in or on
domestic firewood. These pests and diseases pose a danger to
the State's forests, environment, natural resources,
horticultural and agricultural industries, and residents.
The legislature also finds that the United States
Department of Agriculture adopted domestic quarantine
regulations for the wood-boring emerald ash borer, which
2025-2780 SB140 CDl SMA.docx 1

Page 2 140
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
requires much of the firewood harvested in the United States to
be heat-treated before interstate movement or sale. However,
these domestic quarantine regulations were repealed in January
2021.
To fill the gap, many states, including Florida, New York,
Tennessee, and Utah, have adopted requirements mandating that
firewood imported into their respective states be heat-treated
to disinfect the firewood. Additionally, the United States
Department of Agriculture requires that all firewood imported
into Hawaii from a foreign country be treated before
II importation, and all importers are required to possess a timber
and timber products import permit.
The legislature further finds that the Hawaii department of
agriculture does not have any treatment requirements for
firewood. This lack of regulation is a significant biosecurity
gap in Hawaii. Although the Hawaii department of agriculture
held public informational meetings for stakeholders on a
proposed rule that would require treatment of domestically
imported firewood in May and June 2022, the department has not
made progress in adopting administrative rules regarding
firewood treatment standards. The legislature recognizes that
2025-2780 SB140 CDl SMA.docx

Page 3 S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
the National Plant Board, a network of state and territorial
plant pest regulatory agencies, has created model language to
assist states in the adoption of firewood treatment standards to
prevent the spread of pests through firewood. Adopting these
standards will close the existing biosecurity gap in Hawaii.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Prohibit the importation of firewood into the State
unless the firewood is certified as heat-treated and
labeled accordingly or the importation is authorized
and permitted by the department of agriculture before
importation; and
(2) Require persons who import firewood into the State to
maintain, and make available on request, records of
imports for at least two years.
SECTION 2. Chapter 150A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"gl50A- Firewood; heat-treatment; requirements;
exemptions. (a) No firewood shall be imported into the State
unless:
2025-2780 SB140 CDl SMA.docx 3

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) The firewood has been certified by an appropriate
federal or state agency as heat-treated and labeled in
accordance with subsection (b); or
(2) The importation is authorized pursuant to subsection
(c) and the department has issued a permit before
importation.
(b) Each package of firewood imported into the State
pursuant to subsection (a)(1) shall bear a clear and conspicuous
label that contains the following information:
(1) State of origin of the firewood;
(2) A statement that the firewood has been certified as
heat-treated;
(3) The name of the federal or state certifying agency and
the certificate number;
(4) Identification of the commodity as firewood, unless
the contents can be easily identified through the
packaging, wrapper, or container; and
(5) Name and address of the manufacturer, packer, or
distributor of the firewood.
(c) If firewood imported into the State is not eligible
for importation under subsections (a)(1) and (b) and the
2025-2780 SB140 CDl SMA.docx 4

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
department determines that the firewood will not pose an
unacceptable risk of introducing or spreading an insect,
disease, or other pest into the State, the department may issue
a permit authorizing the importation. No firewood shall be
imported into the State pursuant to this subsection before the
department issues a permit.
(d) Any person who imports firewood into the State shall
maintain, and make available to the department upon request,
records of imports for at least two years.
(e) Firewood harvested within the State shall not be
subject to the requirements of this section.
(f) As used in this section;
"Firewood" means any kindling, logs, timber, or other
portions of a tree of any species four feet or less in length;
IS cut or split, or intended to be cut or split,.into a form and
size appropriate for use as fuel for fires in an open or closed
pit, grill, fireplace, stove, or wood burning furnace; or in any
other form commonly used for burning in campfires, stoves, or
fireplaces.
2025-2780 SB140 CDl SMA.docx

Page 6 140
S B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
"Heat-treated" means firewood that has been heated to at
least one hundred sixty degrees Fahrenheit for seventy-five
minutes at wood core."
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2780 SB140 CDl SMA.docx 6

140
S.B. NO.
co
±
O
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this 27th day of June ,2025
•VERNOR OF THE STATE OF HA WAI'I

S.B. No. 140, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
'resident of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 140, SD 2, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives